DI-258 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIARM-01

DTC C1244 /44 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This sensor detects deceleration on the vehicle. The sensor signal is used in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC con-
trol. If the sensor functions abnormally, the ABS warning light comes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either of the following 1., 2., 3. or 4. is detected:

1. The condition that ECU terminals GL1 and GL2 values are
-1.5Gorlessor 1.5 G ormore continuesfor 1.2 sec. or
more.

2. The condition that the deceleration sensor terminal VGS
voltage is 4.4 V or less or 5.6 V or more continues for 1.2
Sec. or more. * Deceleration sensor

3. Atthe vehicle speed of 0 km/h (0 mph), after the difference * Deceleration sensor circuit
of output value between deceleration sensor terminals GL1
and GL2 becomes 0.6 G or more, and the condition that

C1244/ 44

does not become 0.4 G or less continues for 60 sec. or
more.

4. Deceleration sensor signal momentary open occurs for 7
times or more.

WIRING DIAGRAM

Deceleration Sensor Skid Control ECU
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-259
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

2 Check deceleration sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@ Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b) Connect VYSterminaltothe batteries’ positive (+) termi-
) nal,and GYAW terminalto the batteries’ negative ( -)ter-
9 o minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-
L_:Cj{g nals.
ol NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and
GYAW.
CHECK:

Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the
sensor is tilted forward and rearward.

OK:
m Symbols Condition Standard Value

Front
% Rearward GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL1 Leanrearward 1.0V -about2.3V
Forward‘ GLA1 Lean forward About2.3V -3.5V
N F1a707 GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V
GL2 Leanrearward About2.3V -3.5V
GL2 Lean forward 1.0V -about2.3V
HINT:
. Ifthe sensoristilted too much it may show the wrong val-
ue.

. Ifdropped, the sensor should be replaced withanew one.
« Thesensorremovedfromthe vehicle should notbe
placed upside down.

NG> Replace deceleration sensor.
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DI-260 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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